Massachusetts, session 194th, H564.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 71B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 8 the following section: 
Section 8A. (a) As used in this section, the term “special transportation van” shall mean a 
van, bus, or other motor vehicle used exclusively or primarily to transport school-age children 
with disabilities or other persons with disabilities.   
(b) Any bus driver, monitor, or qualified attendant responsible for transporting a school-
age child with a disability on a special transportation van shall be trained and certified in first 
aid, including cardiopulmonary resuscitation.  
(c) School districts shall provide any bus driver, monitor, or qualified attendant 
responsible for transporting a school-age child with a disability on a special transportation van 

of 2 11 with a written report pertaining to each school-age child with a disability such bus driver, 
monitor or qualified attendant is responsible for transporting.  The report shall identify any 
sensory, neurological, emotional, communication, physical, intellectual or health impairment, or 
a combination thereof, that the district believes may affect the safety of the child during 
transportation on the special transportation van.  The school district shall only provide the 
written report pursuant to this subsection if provision of such report is required by the student’s 
individualized education program or the school district has received written consent from a 
parent or guardian of the student.